New Jersey, session 221, S2962.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 8 of P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.32) is amended to read as follows: 8.    Contractors and subcontractors performing public work of a public body subject to the provisions of [this act] the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) shall [post]: a. Post the prevailing wage rates for each craft and classification involved as determined by the commissioner, including the effective date of any changes thereof, in prominent and easily accessible places at the site of the work or at such place or places as are used by them to pay workmen their wages; and b. Conduct a mandatory orientation meeting for each employee on the employees first day of a project that explains the employees wages under the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) and the employees classification under that law. An employer may satisfy this requirement by conducting one orientation meeting to a group of employees if the employees commence employment on the same day.  Upon completion of the orientation, each employee shall be required to sign a form, promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, stating that the employee has received the orientation. The contractor or subcontractor conducting the orientation shall retain each completed form for a period of no less than five years and shall make each completed form available to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development upon request by the department. (cf: P.L.1963, c.150, s.8) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except that the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.